Massachusetts, session 194th, H1470.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Within 45 days after the effective date of this act, a 15-member advisory commission
shall be established to study the best practices and safety protocols of state subsidized senior and
non-elderly disabled housing. The advisory committee shall consist of the following members:
two members selected by the Governor of the Commonwealth; four members selected by the
Speaker of the House; four members selected by the Senate President; one member selected by
the Citizens Housing and Planning Association; one member selected by the Massachusetts
Chapter of the National Association of Housing and Redevelopment Officials; one member
selected by the Mass Union of Public Housing Tenants; one member selected by the Disability
Law Center; one member selected by the Massachusetts Municipal Association.
of 1